Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB396.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 2.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The first day of January (New Year's Day), the third Monday of January (Birthday
of Martin Luther King, Jr.),[ the nineteenth day of January (Robert E. Lee Day),]
the thirtieth day of January (Franklin D. Roosevelt Day), the twelfth day of
February (Lincoln's Birthday), the third Monday in February (Washington's
Birthday), the last Monday in May (Memorial Day),[ the third day of June
(Confederate Memorial Day, and Jefferson Davis Day),] the fourth day of July
(Independence Day), the first Monday in September (Labor Day), the second
Monday in October (Columbus Day), the eleventh day of November (Veterans
Day), the twenty-fifth day of December (Christmas Day) of each year, and all days
appointed by the President of the United States or by the Governor as days of
thanksgiving, are holidays[,] on which all the public offices of this Commonwealth
may be closed.
(2) No person shall be compelled to labor on the first Monday in September (Labor
Day) by any person.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/18/2025 9:01 AM Jacketed